Washington statutes.
RCW 15.13.370

Request by licensee for inspector's services during shipping season—Certificate of inspection—Other requests for inspection and/or certification services—Fees. (Effective until July 1, 2030.)

(1) Any person licensed under the provisions of this chapter may request the services of a department inspector at the licensee's place of business or point of shipment during the shipping season. Subsequent to inspection the inspector shall issue to the licensee a certificate of inspection signed by the inspector covering any horticultural plants or Christmas trees which the inspector finds to be in compliance with the provisions of this chapter.

(2) Any person financially interested in any horticultural plants or Christmas trees may request inspection and/or certification services provided for horticultural plants or Christmas trees under this chapter.

(3) To facilitate the marketing of agricultural commodities and other plant products, the director may provide, if requested, special inspections or certifications not otherwise authorized under this chapter and shall prescribe a fee for that service.

[ 2007 c 335 s 10; 2002 c 215 s 3; 2000 c 144 s 15; 1993 c 120 s 8; 1990 c 261 s 8; 1971 ex.s. c 33 s 13.]

NOTES:

Expiration date—2019 c 206; 2013 c 72; 2007 c 335: See note following RCW 15.13.250.

PDFRCW 15.13.370

Request by licensee for inspector's services during shipping season—Certificate of inspection—Other requests for inspection and/or certification services—Fees. (Effective July 1, 2030.)

(1) Any person licensed under the provisions of this chapter may request the services of a department inspector at the licensee's place of business or point of shipment during the shipping season. Subsequent to inspection the inspector shall issue to the licensee a certificate of inspection signed by the inspector covering any horticultural plants which the inspector finds to be in compliance with the provisions of this chapter.

(2) Any person financially interested in any horticultural plants may request inspection and/or certification services provided for horticultural plants under this chapter.

(3) To facilitate the marketing of agricultural commodities and other plant products, the director may provide, if requested, special inspections or certifications not otherwise authorized under this chapter and shall prescribe a fee for that service.

[ 2002 c 215 s 3; 2000 c 144 s 15; 1993 c 120 s 8; 1990 c 261 s 8; 1971 ex.s. c 33 s 13.]